New Mexico, session 2026, HB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. AUTHORIZATION OF QUALIFYING WATER
PROJECTS.--Pursuant to Section 72-4A-9 NMSA 1978, the
legislature authorizes the New Mexico finance authority to
make loans or grants from the water project fund to the
following qualifying entities for the following qualifying
water projects on terms and conditions established by the
water trust board and the New Mexico finance authority:
1. to the city of Gallup in McKinley county for
one water conservation, treatment, recycling or reuse
project, one water storage, conveyance and delivery project
and one wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
2. to the Albuquerque-Bernalillo county water
utility authority in Bernalillo county for one water
conservation, treatment, recycling or reuse project and one
water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
3. to the village of Los Ranchos de Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county for one water conservation, treatment,
recycling or reuse project and one flood prevention project;
4. to Luna county for a flood prevention project; HB 63/ec
Page 1

5. to the city of Sunland Park in Dona Ana county
for one flood prevention project and two water storage,
conveyance and delivery projects;
6. to Dona Ana county for a flood prevention
project;
7. to the village of Ruidoso in Lincoln county for
one flood prevention project, four water storage, conveyance
and delivery projects and six wastewater conveyance and
treatment projects;
8. to the southern Sandoval county arroyo flood
control authority in Sandoval county for a flood prevention
project;
9. to Lincoln county for a flood prevention
project;
10. to the upper Rio Grande watershed district in
Rio Arriba county for a flood prevention project;
11. to the eastern New Mexico water utility
authority in Curry county for a water storage, conveyance and
delivery project;
12. to the Chupadero water and sewage corporation
in Santa Fe county for a water storage, conveyance and
delivery project;
13. to the city of Farmington in San Juan county
for a water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
14. to Los Alamos county for two water storage, HB 63/ec
Page 2

conveyance and delivery projects;
15. to the city of Raton in Colfax county for a
water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
16. to the Storrie Project water users association
in San Miguel county for two water storage, conveyance and
delivery projects;
17. to the village of Angel Fire in Colfax county
for a water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
18. to the city of Texico in Curry county for a
water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
19. to the city of Las Vegas in San Miguel county
for three water storage, conveyance and delivery projects and
one wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
20. to the Green Ridge mutual domestic water
consumers association in Bernalillo county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
21. to the Mescalero Apache Tribe in Otero county
for one water storage, conveyance and delivery project and
one wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
22. to La Jicarita mutual domestic water alliance
in Taos county for a water storage, conveyance and delivery
project;
23. to the Pueblo of Santa Clara in Rio Arriba
county for two water storage, conveyance and delivery
projects; HB 63/ec
Page 3

24. to the city of Grants in Cibola county for one
water storage, conveyance and delivery project and one
wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
25. to the Vallecitos mutual domestic water
consumers association in Rio Arriba county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
26. to the Guadalupe soil and water conservation
district in Guadalupe county for one water storage,
conveyance and delivery project and one watershed restoration
and management project;
27. to the Greater Chimayo mutual domestic water
consumers association in Santa Fe county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project;
28. to the Sangre de Cristo regional mutual
domestic water consumers and sewage works association in
Guadalupe county for a water storage, conveyance and delivery
project;
29. to the Bosque Gardens mutual domestic water
consumers association in Valencia county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project;
30. to the Regina mutual domestic water consumers
association in Sandoval county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project;
31. to the Tranquillo Pines mutual domestic water
consumers association in Bernalillo county for a water HB 63/ec
Page 4

storage, conveyance and delivery project;
32. to the Costilla mutual domestic water
consumers association in Taos county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project;
33. to the Canjilon mutual domestic water
consumers association in Rio Arriba county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
34. to El Salto mutual domestic water consumers
association in Taos county for a water storage, conveyance
and delivery project;
35. to the Eldorado area water and sanitation
district in Santa Fe county for a water storage, conveyance
and delivery project;
36. to the village of Hatch in Dona Ana county for
a water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
37. to the EMWT regional water association in
Torrance county for two water storage, conveyance and
delivery projects;
38. to the village of Taos Ski Valley in Taos
county for a water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
39. to the town of Mesilla in Dona Ana county for
two water storage, conveyance and delivery projects;
40. to the village of Mosquero in Harding county
for one water storage, conveyance and delivery project and
one wastewater conveyance and treatment project; HB 63/ec
Page 5

41. to the city of Santa Fe in Santa Fe county for
two water storage, conveyance and delivery projects and two
wastewater conveyance and treatment projects;
42. to the Vadito mutual domestic water consumers
association in Taos county for a water storage, conveyance
and delivery project;
43. to McKinley county for two water storage,
conveyance and delivery projects and one wastewater
conveyance and treatment project;
44. to the Canon mutual domestic water consumers
and sewage works association in Sandoval county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
45. to the city of Las Cruces in Dona Ana county
for two water storage, conveyance and delivery projects and
one wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
46. to the town of Springer in Colfax county for a
water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
47. to the city of Portales in Roosevelt county
for two water storage, conveyance and delivery projects and
one wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
48. to the city of Santa Rosa in Guadalupe county
for a water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
49. to the Capulin mutual domestic water consumers
association in Rio Arriba county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project; HB 63/ec
Page 6

50. to the city of Roswell in Chaves county for a
water storage, conveyance and delivery project;
51. to the Paakweree Village mutual domestic water
consumers association in Bernalillo county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
52. to the Eileen Acres mutual domestic water
consumers association in Otero county for one water storage,
conveyance and delivery project and one wastewater conveyance
and treatment project;
53. to the Duranes y Gavilan mutual domestic water
consumers association in Taos county for a water storage,
conveyance and delivery project;
54. to the Puerto de Luna mutual domestic water
consumers association in Guadalupe county for a water
storage, conveyance and delivery project;
55. to the Mora mutual domestic water consumers
and sewage works association in Mora county for a wastewater
conveyance and treatment project;
56. to the Pueblo of Isleta in Bernalillo county
for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
57. to the town of Taos in Taos county for a
wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
58. to the village of Tijeras in Bernalillo county
for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
59. to the east Pecos mutual domestic water HB 63/ec
Page 7

consumers association in San Miguel county for a wastewater
conveyance and treatment project;
60. to the city of Belen in Valencia county for a
wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
61. to the village of Fort Sumner in De Baca
county for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
62. to the village of Los Lunas in Valencia county
for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
63. to the city of Truth or Consequences in Sierra
county for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
64. to the city of Moriarty in Torrance county for
a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
65. to the town of Mountainair in Torrance county
for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
66. to the town of Estancia in Torrance county for
a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
67. to the village of Magdalena in Socorro county
for a wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
68. to the Ramah water and sanitation district in
McKinley county for a wastewater conveyance and treatment
project;
69. to the city of Lovington in Lea county for a
wastewater conveyance and treatment project;
70. to Santa Fe county for a wastewater conveyance
and treatment project; HB 63/ec
Page 8

71. to the San Juan soil and water conservation
district in San Juan county for a watershed restoration and
management project;
72. to the Colfax soil and water conservation
district in Colfax county for a watershed restoration and
management project;
73. to the Mesa soil and water conservation
district in Harding county for a watershed restoration and
management project;
74. to the Claunch-Pinto soil and water
conservation district in Torrance county for a watershed
restoration and management project; and
75. to the Ute Creek soil and water conservation
district in Harding county for a watershed restoration and
management project.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public
peace, health and safety that this act take effect
immediately. HB 63/ec
Page 9